Utah statutes.
53B-18-501.   Nonprofit corporations or foundations -- Purpose.

(1)  In addition to any other powers which it now has, Utah State University may form nonprofit corporations or foundations controlled by the president of the university and the State Board of Regents to aid and assist the university in attaining its charitable, scientific, literary, research, and educational objectives.

(2)  The nonprofit corporations or foundations may receive and administer legislative appropriations, government grants, contracts, and private gifts to carry out their public purposes.



Enacted by Chapter 218, 1988 General Session

